src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@ümberpaigutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ümber#paigutus OLULINE ;
ümberpanek+N:´ümber#panek VIRSIK ;
ümberpanija+N:´ümber#panija AASTA ;
ümberregistreerimine+N:´ümber#registr´eerimine OLULINE ;
ümbersuunamine+N:´ümber#s´uunamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ümbersõnastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ümber#sõnastus OLULINE ;
ümbertegemine+N:´ümber#tegemine OLULINE ;
ümbertõstmine+N:´ümber#t´õstmine OLULINE ;
ümberõpe+N:´ümber#´õpP1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ümberütlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ümber#´ütlus SUULINE ;
ümbrik+N:´ümbr´ik ÜMBRIK ;
ümbrikupalk+N:ümbriku#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ümbris+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ümbris SOOLANE ;
ümbritsev+N:ümbritsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ümbrus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ümbrus SUULINE ;
ümbruskond+N:´ümbrusk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
ümin+N:ümin MAGUS ;
ümiseja+N:ümiseja AASTA ;
ümmardaja+N:ümmardaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ümmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ümmik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@üpsilon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@üpsilon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ürask+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ürask REDEL ;
ürditalu+N:ürdi#talu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
ürgaeg+N:´ürg#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
ürgaine+N:´ürg#´aine PINGE ;
ürginimene+N:´ürg#inimene OLULINE ;
ürgjõud+N:´ürg#j´õuD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ürgkuju+N:´ürg#kuju KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ürgloodus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ürg#l´oodus SUULINE ;
ürgmets+N:´ürg#m´ets%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
ürgorg+N:´ürg#´orG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ürgveis+N:´ürg#v´eis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ürik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ürik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ürikuteadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@üriku#t´eadus SUULINE ;
ürin+N:ürin MAGUS ;
üritaja+N:üritaja AASTA ;
üritamine+N:üritamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@üritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@üritus OLULINE ;
ürp+N:´ürp TAUD ;
@D.Case.Nom@ürt+N:@D.Case.Nom@´ürt TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@üsk+N:@R.Part.One@´üsK1%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
üsked+N:´üske PINGE ;
@R.Part.One@üte+N:@R.Part.One@´ütT1e PINGE ;
ütleja+N:´ütleja AASTA ;
ütlematajäetu+N:´ütlemata#j´äetu AASTA ;
ütlematajätmine+N:´ütlemata#j´ätmine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ütlematus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ütlematus SUULINE ;
ütlemine+N:´ütlemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ütlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ütlus SUULINE ;
üür+N:´üür TAUD ;
üüratu+N:üüratu AASTA ;
üürikorter+N:üüri#k´orter REDEL ;
üürileandja+N:üürile#´andja AASTA ;
üürileping+N:üüri#leping VIRSIK ;
üüriline+N:üüriline OLULINE ;
üüriraha+N:üüri#raha KAVA ;
üüritoake+N:üüri#t´oake PEENIKE ;
üürivõlg+N:üüri#v´õlG1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
üürivõlglane+N:üüri#v´õlglane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@üürnik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´üürn´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šaakal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´aakal REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šabloon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šabl´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šabloonsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šabl´oonsus SUULINE ;
šaboonelk+N:šab´oo#n´el,k TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šafott+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šaf´ot,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šagrään+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šagr´ään TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šahh+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´ahh TAUD ;
šahhimäng+N:šahhi#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šaht+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´aht TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šamaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šam´aan TAUD ;
šamanism+N:šaman´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šamott+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šam´ot,t TAUD ;
šampanja+N:šamp`anja PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šampinjon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šampinjon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šampoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šamp´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šampus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´ampus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šanker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´ankE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šansonett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šanson´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šanss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´anss TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šantaaž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šant´aaž TAUD ;
šantažeerija+N:šantaž´eerija AASTA ;
šapirograaf+N:šapiro#gr´aaf TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šaraab+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šar´aab TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šaraad+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šar´aad TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šariaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šari´aat TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šarlatan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šarlatan TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šarniir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šarn´iir TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šartröös+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šartr´öös TAUD ;
šarž+N:š´arž TAUD ;
šassii+N:šass´ii ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šatään+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šat´ään TAUD ;
šašlõkiliha+N:šašl`õki#liha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šašlõkk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šašl´õkk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šedööver+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šed´öövE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šeff+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´eff TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šeflus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´eflus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šeik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´eik TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šelf+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´elf TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šellak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šellak REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šenill+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šen´il,l TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šerbett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šerb´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šerif+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šerif REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šeriif+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šer´iif TAUD ;
šerri+N:šerri PERE ;
ševiot+N:ševi´ot, KABINET ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ševrett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ševr´et,t TAUD ;
ševroo+N:ševr´oo ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šiffer+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´iffE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šifoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šif´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šiiit+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ši´iit TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šikk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´ikk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šilling+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šilling REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šimpans+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šimp´ans TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šinjoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šinj´oon TAUD ;
šintoism+N:šinto´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šlaager+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šl´aagE2r REDEL ;
šlahta+N:šlahta PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šlahtitš+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šlahtitš REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šlakk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šl´akk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šnitsel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šn´itsE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šnitt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šn´it,t TAUD ;
šokireklaam+N:šoki#rekl´aam TAUD ;
šokiseisund+N:šoki#seisund REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šokk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´okk TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šokolaad+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š`okol´aad TAUD ;
šotlane+N:š´otlane SUULINE ;
šotlanna+N:š´otlanna PERE ;
šovinism+N:šovin´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šovinist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šovin´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@špits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šp´it,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šrapnell+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šrapn´el,l TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šrift+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šr´ift TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šuaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šu´aan TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šugnaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šugn´aan TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šunt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@š´un,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@švaab+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šv´aab TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@švamm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šv´amm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@šveitser+N:@P.Stem.Nom@šv´eitser REDEL ;
šveitslane+N:šv´eitslane SUULINE ;
šveitslanna+N:šv´eitslanna PERE ;
šõu+N:š´õu ARMEE ;
žaboo+N:žab´oo ARMEE ;
žalusii+N:žalus´ii ARMEE ;
žandarmeeria+N:žandarm´eeria AASTA ;
žanr+N:ž´anr REDEL ;
žanr+N:ž´anr TAUD ;
žanrimaal+N:ž´anri#m´aal, TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žargoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žarg´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@želatiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ž`elat´iin TAUD ;
želee+N:žel´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ženšenn+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ženš´en,n TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žest+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ž´es,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žestikulatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žestikulatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žetoon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žet´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žgutt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žg´ut,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žiig+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ž´iig TAUD ;
žiiro+N:žiiro PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žilett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žil´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žiraff+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žir´aff TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žirant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žir´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žonglöör+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žongl´öör TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žoržett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žorž´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žurnaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@žurn´aal TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@žurnalist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ž`urnal´ist TAUD ;
žurnalistika+N:žurnal`is,tika AASTA ;
žürii+N:žür´ii ARMEE ;
lapselaps+N: LAPSELAPS ;
lapselapselaps+N: LAPSELAPSELAPS ;
